Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-3803
Kratom product; person under twenty-one years of age; acts prohibited; age-verification system.

(1) No person shall sell, offer for sale, provide, or distribute a kratom product to a person under twenty-one years of age.

(2) An online retailer or marketplace that sells or offers for sale a kratom product shall implement an age-verification system to ensure compliance with this section.

Laws 2025, LB230, § 3.